Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-566
Class IV school district; board of education; officers; employees, selection.

The board of education of a Class IV school district shall at a regular meeting elect from outside its own members a superintendent, an associate superintendent of instruction, an associate superintendent of business affairs, a school district treasurer, and the number of employees the board of education may deem necessary for the proper conduct of the affairs of the school district at such salaries as the board of education may determine. The board may contract with them for terms not to exceed three years. The election of all officers of the board of education and all elections for filling vacancies on the board of education shall be by ballot. No person shall be declared elected unless he or she receives the vote of a majority of all the members of the board of education.

Laws 1917, c. 225, § 8, p. 552;

C.S.1922, § 6617;

Laws 1929, c. 94, § 4, p. 354;

C.S.1929, § 79-2608;

Laws 1937, c. 182, § 5, p. 717;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-2608;

R.S.1943, § 79-2608;

Laws 1949, c. 269, § 1, p. 883;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 212, p. 760;

Laws 1969, c. 257, § 40, p. 953;

R.S.1943, (1971), § 79-525;

Laws 1971, LB 450, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 84, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-908;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 319.